Utah statutes.
36-13-1.   Distribution of legislative publications by Legislature.

The Legislature is responsible for printing, storing, and distributing:

(1)  the legislative session laws;

(2)  the House and Senate Journals;

(3)  the Utah Code Annotated; and

(4)  all other legislative reports and publications of Utah statutes.

